Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-698
Accident; failure
to stop; penalty.

(1)
Any person convicted of violating section 60-697 relative to the duty to stop
in the event of certain accidents shall be guilty of (a) a Class IIIA felony
if the accident resulted in an injury to any person other than a serious bodily
injury as defined in section 60-6,198 or death or (b) a Class III felony if
the accident resulted in the death of any person or serious bodily injury
as defined in section 60-6,198.

(2) The court shall, as part
of the judgment of conviction, order such person not to drive any motor vehicle
for any purpose for a period of not less than one year nor more than fifteen
years from the date ordered by the court and
shall order that the operator's license of such person be revoked for a like
period. The order of the court shall be administered upon sentencing, upon
final judgment of any appeal or review, or upon the date that any probation
is revoked, whichever is later.

Laws 1931, c. 110, § 56, p. 324;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-1187;

R.S.1943, § 39-763;

Laws 1953, c. 214, § 2, p. 757;

R.R.S.1943, § 39-763;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 27;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,104.03;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 18;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 194;

Laws 1997, LB 772, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 925, § 9;

Laws 2011, LB675, § 6.

The grade of the offense is determined by the maximum punishment authorized. Carr v. State, 152 Neb. 248, 40 N.W.2d 677 (1950).

This section provides penalty for violation of statutory provisions requiring driver to stop in event of an accident. Behrens v. State, 140 Neb. 671, 1 N.W.2d 289 (1941).